Hawaii, session 2026, SB819.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the BridgeUSA J-1 visa program, administered by the United States Department of State, offers foreign teachers an opportunity to teach in accredited schools in the United States servicing students in grades kindergarten through twelve.  The J-1 visa program, was also designed to help address the ongoing chronic teacher shortage while providing academic and cultural exchange opportunities to visiting teachers.  Additionally, the J-1 visa program offers the opportunity for foreign teachers of various backgrounds to become a part of educational communities to reflect the diverse student populations. The legislature also finds that 22.4 per cent of the public school student population identifies as Filipino, while 7.4 per cent of educators share the same background.  According to the federal Institute of Education Sciences, diverse educator representation significantly impacts student learning. Teachers of color can often help close achievement gaps and improve attendance and behavioral outcomes, and are highly rated by students of all backgrounds. Beyond academic benefits, having educators who reflect their students' backgrounds can inspire future aspirations.  Seeing role models in the classroom can encourage students to pursue similar career paths.  Presently, the State's implementation of the J-1 visa program has aimed to expose Filipino children to Filipino educators, inspiring them to consider careers in education.  Conversely, the J-1 visa program has further contributed to classroom diversity while eliminating certain barriers to academic achievement. Since its implementation, the J-1 visa program has been a resounding success.  To date, two hundred eighteen internationally certified educators, primarily from the Philippines, serve in fifty-five public schools statewide.  Similar to the Philippines, Kenya also has strong educational equivalencies, and the State's first J-1 teacher from Kenya was hired at an elementary school serving military families accustomed to working with diverse educators around the globe.  Educators from the J-1 visa program are positively impacting the State's diverse classrooms, and the program has strong support from community organizations, including groups from the Filipino community. However, the State's existing licensing rules hinder the full potential of prospective teachers for the J-1 visa program. Unlike states such as Alaska, Nevada, and North Carolina, which have streamlined licensing processes for international educators, Hawaii classifies J-1 teachers as "emergency hires". This designation requires prospective participants to take a series of additional comprehensive examinations that can exceed $1,000 in costs.  Preparing for these exams significantly reduces the time available to analyze formative assessments, meet with families, and plan curriculum.  Further, J-1 teachers are ineligible for additional compensation offered to educators in hard-to-fill positions despite performing equal work. The legislature further finds that the State's existing licensure reciprocity policies do not adequately recognize the international qualifications of J-1 teachers.  This limitation contradicts the department of education's commitment to being "globally competitive and locally committed".  By creating a more inclusive and equitable licensing system, the State can fully leverage the skills, knowledge, and experience of international educators. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to recognize the qualifications and experience of international teachers, while ensuring equitable compensation, by requiring the Hawaii teacher standards board to establish a provisional licensing pathway for visiting international teachers. SECTION 2.  Section 302A-802, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c)  The board shall adopt policies, exempt from chapters 91 and 92, to initiate the following: (1)  Develop criteria allowing more individuals with trade or industry experience to teach in vocational, technical, and career pathway programs, and criteria for the issuance of permits allowing qualified individuals to teach when recommended by the superintendent or the commission, when appropriate.  The department or the commission, when appropriate, shall be responsible for the review and acceptance of the relevant licenses, certificates, or other qualifications related to an individual's vocational, technical, or career pathway education-related experience that the department or the commission, when appropriate, deems necessary for a permit.  The department or the commission, when appropriate, shall have the authority to waive the requirement of a bachelor's degree to teach in a vocation, technical, or career pathway education program; (2)  Develop a plan to accept teachers from any state as long as they have completed state-approved teacher education programs and pass relevant Hawaii teacher examinations or their equivalent; (3)  Clarify the requirements, on a state-by-state basis, for out-of-state licensed teachers to obtain a license in Hawaii; (4)  Develop a plan to facilitate licensing for those who intend to teach in Hawaii immersion programs, the island of Niihau, or any other extraordinary situation as defined by the superintendent or the superintendent's designee, or by the commission, when appropriate; (5)  Pursue full teacher license reciprocity with all other states; [and] (6)  Develop a plan to facilitate an optional certification for those who teach or intend to teach at private schools[.]; and (7)  Establish a visiting international teacher license to promote cultural and educational exchange between the State and other countries.  The international teacher license shall provide teachers hired by the department or public charter schools the ability to teach all subjects and grade levels that the teacher is qualified to teach; provided that: (A)  International teachers hired by the department or public charter schools as part of a designated exchange visitor program of the United States Department of State shall be issued a renewable visiting international teacher license upon receipt of the following: (i)  A valid and current J-1 visa; (ii)  The equivalent of a United States bachelor's degree or higher; (iii)  Completion of an equivalent United States teacher preparation program that verifies basic skills and content knowledge; (iv)  A valid teaching license in the teacher's home country; (v)  Verification of three years of employment at a public or private school in a pre‑kindergarten through grade twelve setting; and (B)  Renewal of a visiting international teacher license shall be conditioned on the existence of a valid and current J-1 visa and participation in a designated exchange visitor program of the United States Department of State." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.